Utah statutes.
32A-8-503 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Qualifications.
(1) (a)  The commission may not grant a local industry representative license
to a person who has been convicted of:
(i)  a felony under any federal or state law;
(ii)  any violation of any federal or state law or local ordinance concerning
the sale, manufacture, distribution, importing, warehousing, adulteration, or
transportation of alcoholic beverages;
(iii)  any crime involving moral turpitude; or
(iv)  on two or more occasions within the five years before the day on which
the license is granted, driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug.
(b)  In the case of a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company
the proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any of the following has
been convicted of any offense described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  a partner;
(ii)  a managing agent;
(iii)  a manager;
(iv)  an officer;
(v)  a director;
(vi)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the applicant corporation; or
(vii)  a member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability
company.
(c)  The proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any person employed
to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for the local industry
representative has been convicted of any offense described in Subsection
(1)(a).
(2)  The commission may immediately suspend or revoke the local industry
representative license if after the day on which the local industry
representative license is granted, a person described in Subsection (1)(a),
(b), or (c):
(a)  is found to have been convicted of any offense described in Subsection
(1)(a) prior to the license being granted; or
(b)  on or after the day on which the license is granted:
(i)  is convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or
(iii); or
(ii) (A)  is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug; and
(B)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the day on
which the person is convicted of the offense described in Subsection
(2)(b)(ii)(A).
(3)  The director may take emergency action by immediately suspending the
operation of the local industry representative license according to the
procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act, for the period during which the criminal matter is being adjudicated if a
person described in Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is arrested on a charge for an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i),
(ii), or (iii); or
(b) (i)  is arrested on a charge for the offense of driving under the
influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any
drug; and
(ii)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the
day on which the person is arrested on a charge described in Subsection
(3)(b)(i).
(4) (a) (i)  The commission may not grant a local industry representative
license to an individual who has had any type of license, agency, or permit
issued under this title revoked within the last three years.
(ii)  The commission may not grant a local industry representative license to
an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company
if any partner, managing agent, manager, officer, director, stockholder who
holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of an applicant
corporation, or member who owns at least 20% of an applicant limited liability
company is or was:
(A)  a partner or managing agent of any partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(B)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds or held at
least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of any corporation that
had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked
within the last three years; or
(C)  a manager or member who owns or owned at least 20% of any limited
liability company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under
this title revoked within the last three years.
(b)  An applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company may not be granted a local industry representative license if any of
the following had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked while acting in that person's individual capacity within the
last three years:
(i) a  partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii) a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii) a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(c)  A person acting in an individual capacity may not be granted an industry
representative license if that person was:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of a partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who held at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation that had any
type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the
last three years; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owned at least 20% of a limited liability
company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked within the last three years.
(5) (a)  The commission may not grant a local industry representative license
to a minor.
(b)  The commission may not grant a local industry representative license to
an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company
if any of the following is a minor:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(6)  Except as otherwise provided, the commission may not grant a local
industry representative license to:
(a) a holder of any retail license issued under this title that sells:
(i)  spirituous liquor;
(ii)  wine;
(iii)  heavy beer; or
(iv)  on or after October 1, 2008, a flavored malt beverage;
(b) an employee or agent of any retail license issued under this title that
sells:
(i)  spirituous liquor;
(ii)  wine;
(iii)  heavy beer; or
(iv)  on or after October 1, 2008, a flavored malt beverage; or
(c) an individual, partnership, corporation, or limited liability company who
holds any interest in any retail license issued under this title that sells:
(i)  spirituous liquor;
(ii)  wine;
(iii)  heavy beer; or
(iv)  on or after October 1, 2008, a flavored malt beverage.
(7)  If an individual, partnership, corporation, or limited liability company
to whom a local industry representative license has been issued under this
part no longer possesses the qualifications required by this title for
obtaining that license, the commission may suspend or revoke that license.
